DI-1132
DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

DIAX5-01

DTC B1269 | Theft deterrent ECU communication stop

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

This DTC is output when communication stops between the theft deterrent ECU and the Body ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

No communication from theft deterrent ECU for more than 10 | « Theft deterrent ECU

B1269 seconds. *Wire harness

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-1118.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkwire harness.

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.
Wire harness side connector of ECU Terminal
Theftdeterrent ECU - Body ECU MPX1 (T9-31) - MPX3 (B 14-26)
CHECK:
Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.
| Body ECU
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OK:
There is a continuity between the connectors.

HINT:

If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.
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Repair or replace wire harness.

Replace Theft deterrent ECU
(See page IN-38).
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